Utah statutes.
26-38-7.   Enforcement action by proprietors.

(1)  An owner or the agent or employee of the owner of a place where smoking is prohibited under Subsection 26-38-3(1) who observes a person smoking in apparent violation of this chapter shall request the person to stop smoking.

(2)  If the person fails to comply, the proprietor or the agent or employee of the proprietor shall ask the person to leave the premises.



Amended by Chapter 171, 2012 General Session

